es: Variedad de semillas de sésamo: Negro; Dorado; Mixto; Blanco; Otro
hu: Szezámmagfajta: Fekete; Arany; Kevert; Fehér; Egyéb
fi: Seesaminsiementen lajike: Musta; Kultainen; Sekoitus; Valkoinen; Muu
en: Sesame seed variety: Black; Golden; Mixed; White; Other
it: Varietà di semi di sesamo: Nero; Dorato; Misto; Bianco; Altro
ja: ゴマの種類: 黒; ゴールデン; ミックス; 白; その他
cs: Odrůda sezamových semínek: Černý sezam; Zlatý sezam; Směs; Bílý sezam; Jiné
da: Sesamfrøsort: Sort; Gylden; Blandet; Hvid; Andet
lt-LT: Sezamo sėklų rūšis: Juodos; Auksinės; Mišrios; Baltos; Kita
zh-TW: 芝麻品種: 黑色; 金色; 混合; 白色; 其他
bg-BG: Сорт сусамово семе: Черно; Златно; Смесено; Бяло; Друго
sv: Sesamfrösort: Svart; Gyllene; Blandad; Vit; Övrigt
nl: Sesamzaad variant: Zwart; Goud; Gemengd; Wit; Overig
sk-SK: Odroda sezamových semienok: Čierna; Zlatá; Zmiešané; Biela; Iné
vi: Giống hạt mè: Màu đen; Vàng; Hỗn hợp; Màu trắng; Khác
zh-CN: 芝麻品种: 黑色; 金色; 混合; 白色; 其他
el: Ποικιλία σουσαμιού: Μαύρο; Χρυσό; Ανάμεικτο; Λευκό; Άλλο
ko: 참깨 품종: 검정색; 황금색; 혼합; 흰색; 기타
pt-BR: Semente de gergelim variedade: Preto; Dourado; Misto; Branco; Outro
pl: Odmiana nasion sezamu: Czarny; Złoty; Mieszany; Biały; Inne
de: Sesamsamensorte: Schwarz; Golden; Gemischt; Weiß; Andere
hr-HR: Sorta sjemenki sezama: Crni; Zlatni; Miješani; Bijeli; Ostalo
pt-PT: Variedade das sementes de sésamo: Preto; Dourado; Misto; Branco; Outro
tr: Susam tohumu çeşidi: Siyah; Altın; Karışık; Beyaz; Diğer
ru: Разновидность кунжутных семян: Черные; Золотистые; Смешанные; Белые; Другое
th: พันธุ์เมล็ดงา: ดำ; ทอง; ผสม; ขาว; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Sorta sezamovih semen: Črna; Zlata; Mešana; Bela; Drugo
fr: Variété de graines de sésame: Noir; Doré; Mixte; Blanc; Autre
nb: Sesamfrøvariant: Svart; Gylden; Blandet; Hvit; Annet
ro-RO: Varietate de semințe de susan: Negru; Aurii; Mixte; Alb; Altele